services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/tl.dic
Filipino/O
Kristiyano/O
Kristo/YO
Pasipiko/O
Pilato/YO
Ruso/O
Tsino/O
abusado/O
administratibo/O
agresibo/O
akalain/G
ako/YO
aksyon/G
alinman/G
alipala/Y
alpabeto/O
amerikano/O
amin/G
anila/Y
animo/Y
aniya/Y
ano/YO
anuman/G
anyo/O
apo/O
arawan/G
armado/O
asa/P
aso/O
atin/G
atrasado/O
awa/NP
ayon/P
babasa/N
babasahin/G
baga/Y
bago/NO
bago/YO
bagyo/O
bahay/A
balak/I
balangkas/I
balat/A
balik/A
balikat/AI
balo/O
balut/A
bang/I
banggit/I
banggit/N
bangko/O
bantay/A
baril/A
baro/O
basa/I
basa/N
basag/I
basahan/G
basbas/A
batas/A
batay/A
bato/O
bawal/A
bawas/A
bayad/P
bayan/G
baybay/I
beterano/O
bibigyan/G
bigkas/I
bihag/I
bihis/A
bilang/AI
bilanggo/O
bili/I
bili/P
binabalik/A
binabalikan/G
binabawas/A
binatilyo/O
binigyan/G
binyag/A
bisita/I
boluntaryo/O
bubuhay/I
bubuo/N
bubuuin/G
buhangin/A
buhat/I
buhay/I
buho/O
bumaba/I
bunton/G
buo/NO
bura/I
buti/I
buwan/GA
daan/GA
dadaan/A
dadalaw/I
dagdag/A
dagdag/PN
dahil/A
dako/O
dala/I
dala/N
dalang/I
dalaw/I
dalisay/I
dama/P
damdam/I
damdamin/G
daraan/A
daranas/I
delikado/O
demonyo/O
deposito/O
detalyado/O
determinasyon/G
digmaan/G
dinaan/A
dinadaan/A
dinagdag/A
dinamiko/O
dinig/P
disiplina/I
disiplina/P
dito/YO
diumano/Y
diyos-diyos/A
diyos-diyosan/G
dugo/O
dumapo/O
duon/G
edukado/O
eksakto/O
eksamen/G
eksperto/O
elemento/O
epektibo/O
eroplano/O
estado/O
gaano/O
gabay/A
gagabay/A
gagamit/I
gaganap/I
gagawin/G
galang/I
galaw/AI
gamit/AI
gamot/P
ganap/I
ganito/YO
ganoon/G
gastos/P
gawa/Y
gawain/G
gaya/I
gayun/G
ginagalaw/A
ginagamit/A
ginamit/A
ginaw/A
ginoo/O
gising/I
gobyerno/O
grupo/O
gulay/A
gumuho/O
gunita/Y
gusto/O
hadlang/A
hagdan/A
hahanap/I
haharap/I
haharap/N
hahawak/A
hahayaan/G
hain/GA
hakbang/I
halal/N
halaman/AG
halik/A
halimbawa/Y
hamak/I
hanap/AI
hanap/N
hanggan/GA
harang/AI
harap/AI
harap/N
harapan/G
hawak/A
hayag/N
henerasyon/G
higpit/A
hihiling/AI
hihirang/I
hila/I
hiling/AI
himno/O
hinahanap/A
hinihiling/A
hiniling/A
hintay/I
hintayin/G
hiram/I
hirang/I
hiwalay/A
hiwalay/N
hukay/N
hukbo/O
huli/I
huli/P
iba/Y
ibayo/O
ibon/G
ika/Y
ikatlo/O
iksamen/G
impeksyon/G
inaasahan/G
inasahan/G
inom/P
insekto/O
institusyon/G
interesado/O
inutusan/G
inyo/YO
ipinangako/O
isa/Y
isipan/G
itinago/O
itinatayo/O
ito/YO
iyo/YO
iyon/G
ka/P
kababaihan/G
kabatiran/G
kabayan/A
kabigat/A
kabit/A
kabuluhan/G
kadalas/A
kadalasan/G
kagamitan/G
kagat/I
kagawaran/G
kaguluhan/G
kahalo/O
kaharian/G
kahinaan/G
kahirap/A
kahiwalay/NP
kahulugan/G
kahusay/A
kailangan/GI
kain/GAI
kain/PG
kainaman/G
kaing/I
kaintindi/P
kakabit/P
kakaiba/P
kakaibang/P
kakain/I
kakain/P
kakaroon/P
kakayahan/G
kakilala/PN
kaklase/P
kalaban/I
kalagayan/G
kalakal/A
kalakas/A
kalakasan/G
kalalabas/A
kalan/G
kalat/P
kalawak/A
kaligtasan/G
kalihim/A
kaliit/A
kalimutan/G
kalinga/P
kaloob/A
kalooban/P
kaltas/I
kaluluwa/Y
kalupaan/G
kamahal/A
kamalayan/G
kamo/O
kampi/P
kanila/Y
kanino/O
kaninuman/G
kaniya/Y
kanta/P
kanta/Y
kanya/Y
kapagdaka/Y
kapakanan/G
kapanahunan/G
kapansanan/G
kapantay/A
kapareho/PO
kapasiyahan/G
kapinsalaan/G
kapiraso/O
kapisan/A
kapit/P
kapitbahay/A
karagatan/G
karamihan/G
karaniwan/G
karoon/P
kasakit/A
kasalanan/G
kasalungat/A
kasama/Y
kasanayan/G
kasinungalingan/G
kasunduan/P
kasuotan/G
katagal/A
katamtaman/G
katao/P
katapusan/G
katawan/IG
katawan/P
katha/P
katipan/G
katotohan/A
katugon/G
katutubo/O
katuwaan/G
kaugnayan/G
kausap/I
kawal/A
kawalang/P
kawanihan/G
kaya/Y
kayo/YO
kikita/NP
kilala/P
kilo/O
kilos/P
kilusan/G
kinain/A
kinakailangan/G
kinatawan/G
kita/NP
kita/Y
ko/YO
kolektibo/O
kompetisyon/G
komplikado/O
kongkreto/O
konsepto/O
konstruksyon/G
konsulta/I
konsulta/P
konsumo/P
kontak/I
kontak/P
kontrol/I
kontrol/P
koordinado/O
kopya/I
kopya/P
korporasyon/G
kredito/O
kudlit/A
kuha/P
kukulang/I
kukulang/P
kulto/O
kumpleto/OI
kumpleto/PO
kuwadrado/O
kuwan/P
kuwarto/O
kwalipikado/O
kwenta/P
laan/G
labag/I
labag/P
laban/PA
labas/P
laganap/P
lagay/A
lagay/NP
lagda/P
lagyan/P
lahok/P
lakad/P
lakas/P
lakbay/I
lakbay/PN
laki/P
lakip/A
lakip/P
lalaban/P
lalabas/P
lalagay/PN
lalagda/P
lalakad/P
lalang/I
lalang/P
lalapit/N
lalawigan/G
lalim/P
lalo/O
lampas/A
lampas/P
landas/I
lansangan/G
lapastangan/GI
lapastangan/P
lapat/A
lapit/P
larawan/G
law/I
lawak/P
laya/P
layag/P
layo/PO
layon/G
liban/P
libing/P
libo/O
libu-libo/O
ligtas/N
liham/P
lihis/P
likas/P
likha/P
likido/O
lilikha/P
lilipat/PA
limang-taon/G
limbag/N
limitado/O
limot/P
linaw/I
lingkuran/P
linis/I
linis/NP
lipad/P
lipas/P
lisensiyado/O
litaw/P
liwanag/I
loko/I
loob/AI
lubog/P
lubusan/G
luha/P
luha/Y
lulubog/P
lulutas/I
lumalago/O
lunas/P
lupa/Y
lupon/G
maagap/A
maamo/O
maawain/G
mabango/O
mabilis/A
madalian/G
maginoo/O
magkagayo/Y
magkaibigan/G
magpalit/A
magsal/I
magulo/O
mahabag/I
mahal/I
mahalaga/Y
mahirap/A
maiiwasan/G
maingat/A
mainit/I
makabuluhan/G
makamundo/O
makapangyarihan/G
makasaysayan/G
makatayo/O
makatwiran/G
makipag-ugnay/A
malalayo/O
malapit/A
malas/I
maliit/I
malimutan/G
malinaw/A
mamagkano/O
mana/I
mana/N
manang/A
mapagpipilian/G
mapigil/A
mapipigil/A
mapipilitan/G
marinero/O
masaya/I
masyon/G
mata/YI
matalino/O
matatagal/A
matawag/A
matiis/I
matino/O
matulin/G
mekanismo/O
milyon/G
misyonero/O
mo/YO
moderno/O
mulat/N
mundo/YO
na/Y
naalis/A
naatasan/G
nabubuo/O
nagbalik/A
naghihingalo/O
nagkataon/G
nagpalit/A
nais/I
naisip/A
naituro/O
naiwan/AG
nakaugalian/G
nakaupo/O
nakaw/AI
nananahan/G
nangako/O
nanghahawak/A
napigilan/G
nasumpungan/G
natamo/O
natigil/A
nawa/Y
nawalan/G
negatibo/O
nga/Y
nila/Y
ninuno/O
ninyo/YO
nito/YO
niya/Y
niyaon/G
niyog/A
noo/YO
obhetibo/O
ong/P
operasyon/G
organisado/O
pa/Y
paalis/I
pabalik/I
pabango/O
pag-aral/A
pag-uugnay/A
pagbawal/A
pagbawalan/G
pagbuti/I
pagdaan/A
pagdaka/Y
paghiwalay/I
pagkakaloob/A
pagkakasal/I
pagkatalo/O
pagod/N
pagpapalit/A
pagpapatakbo/O
pagsama/I
pagsasama/I
pagsikapan/G
pagyaman/I
pahirap/A
pakain/I
pakialam/A
pakikipag-ugnay/A
pakinabang/A
pakita/N
pala/Y
palabas/I
palagian/G
palakas/AI
palakas/N
palalim/I
palalo/O
palay/A
palibhasa/Y
pamantayan/G
pambatas/A
pampanitikan/G
pananampalataya/Y
pananatili/I
panandalian/G
pandaigdig/A
pandamdam/I
pangako/O
pangangaral/A
pangasiwaan/G
pangkapaligiran/G
pangkat/I
panguna/I
panig/A
paninindigan/G
pansin/IG
pantalon/G
pantao/O
papaalis/I
papalit/A
paparito/O
papatay/I
papayag/A
papunta/I
paraan/IG
paratang/A
partido/O
pasan/I
pataas/I
patag/I
pataw/A
patay/AI
patibay/AI
patibay/N
patunay/A
patunayan/G
payo/O
pigil/AI
pigil/P
pilit/AI
pilit/N
pinagmulan/G
pinangangalagaan/G
pinas/A
pinayagan/G
pinipigil/A
pinto/O
pito/O
po/YO
pondo/O
preso/O
presyon/G
prinsipyo/O
progreso/O
proyekto/O
pulpito/O
pung/A
punit/I
punta/N
pupunta/N
puri/I
pursigido/O
puso/YO
puson/G
puwersa/I
puwit/A
pwesto/O
regalo/O
rehistro/P
relihiyon/G
repaso/P
reporma/I
respeto/P
retirado/O
rito/YO
sa/I
sabi/NP
sabihan/P
sabing/N
sagot/P
sakahan/G
sakay/P
saklaw/I
sakop/P
sakripisyo/O
saksak/A
saksi/P
sala/Y
salakay/I
salakay/P
salang/P
salin/P
salita/Y
salungat/AI
salungat/P
sama/P
samantala/I
sambit/I
sana/Y
sanay/I
sandatahan/G
sang-ayon/P
sangayon/P
sangguni/P
sapi/P
sarili/P
sasagawa/P
sasalita/P
sasama/P
sasamahan/P
sasamba/I
sasapit/I
sayang/I
seguro/O
seksyon/G
sentro/O
sertipiko/O
sigaw/A
sigaw/P
sigurado/O
sikap/I
sikat/P
sila/Y
silang/P
silay/A
silbi/P
silip/I
simulan/G
simulan/P
singil/AI
singil/P
sino/O
sinta/P
sinundan/G
sinusulat/A
sira/P
sisi/I
sisi/P
sisingil/I
sitwasyon/G
siya/Y
subok/P
sugpo/P
sukab/A
sukat/AI
sukat/P
sulat/AI
sulat/PN
sulit/I
sulit/P
sulo/O
sulong/P
sulyap/P
sumpa/P
sunod/P
sunog/P
suot/P
suporta/P
susog/P
susuko/P
susulat/PN
susulong/P
susuri/P
taas/A
tabernakulo/O
taglay/I
tago/O
tagpuan/G
takas/A
talino/O
tambak/A
tanan/G
tanaw/I
tangay/I
tanggap/AI
tanghal/AI
tantiya/I
tao/YO
tapat/A
tapos/N
tatag/N
tatanggap/I
tatangkain/G
tatapos/N
tatlo/O
tawag/AI
tayo/YO
templo/YO
timbang/AI
tinawag/A
tinawagan/G
tipan/GA
tipo/O
tirahan/G
titiyak/N
tiya/I
totoo/YO
tubig/A
tubo/O
tuklas/I
tulong/P
tuloy/N
tumatakbo/O
tumutulo/O
tuntunin/G
turo/PO
tutoo/O
tuwa/Y
umano/YO
una/Y
uno/O
upahan/G
usapan/P
wakas/A
wasak/PN
wika/Y
winika/Y
yakap/I
yakap/P
yari/NP
yo/O
yumaon/G
